West Virginia, session 2026, SB366.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Physical Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-20-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Physical Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Physical Therapy (general provisions for physical therapist and physical therapist assistant, 16 CSR 01), is authorized.